test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-veeskir_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - veeskir: # 2A v -kk, sk s'k, ee >iä, VV V; C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    veeskir+N+Sg+Nom: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Gen: viäsˊkár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Acc: viäsˊkár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Ill: viäsˊkárân
    veeskir+N+Sg+Loc: viäsˊkárist
    veeskir+N+Sg+Com: [viäsˊkáráin, viäsˊkárááin]
    veeskir+N+Sg+Abe: viäsˊkárttáá
    veeskir+N+Ess:   [veˊskirin, viäsˊkárin]
    veeskir+N+Par:   [veˊskirid, viäsˊkárid]
    veeskir+N+Pl+Nom: viäsˊkáreh
    veeskir+N+Pl+Gen: viäsˊkárij
    veeskir+N+Pl+Acc: viäsˊkárijd
    veeskir+N+Pl+Ill: [viäsˊkáráid, viäsˊkárááid]
    veeskir+N+Pl+Loc: viäsˊkárijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Com: [viäsˊkárijguin, viäsˊkárijguim, viäs'kárijgijn]
    veeskir+N+Pl+Abe: viäsˊkárijttáá
